Hawaii statutes.
[§612-5] Disqualification by interest.
No person shall sit as a juror in any case in which the person's relative by
affinity or by consanguinity within the third degree is interested, either as a
plaintiff or defendant, or in the issue of which the juror has, either directly
or through such relative, any pecuniary interest. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next